Mississippi statutes. Title 51. Waters, Water Resources, Water Districts, Drainage, and Flood Control
Article 1. Provisions Common to Drainage Districts.
§ 51-33-121.
Law as additional method of dissolution.

Sections 51-33-105 through 51-33-121 shall be cumulative and additional and supplementary to any and all other laws of the State of Mississippi which provide for the dissolution of drainage districts and for the affairs of said districts to be wound up. In the event a petition filed under said sections is dismissed, the same shall be dismissed without prejudice and another may be filed again thereafter whenever the petitioners are able to bring themselves within the terms of said sections.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4670; Laws, 1938, ch. 258.

§ 51-33-123.
Saving statute.

Drainage districts heretofore organized under the provisions of any law and amendments thereto not brought forward in this code shall have the privilege of continuing to operate under such law, and the adoption of this code shall not be held to repeal any such law or laws and amendments thereto, in so far as such districts are concerned. However, all drainage districts hereafter created must be organized and shall operate under the provisions of Chapters 29, 31 and 33 of Title 51, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4527; 1942, § 4756.

§ 51-33-125.
Transfer of powers, duties and responsibilities of dissolved drainage districts with federally funded water impoundment structures to county soil and water conservation districts.

The duties, powers and responsibilities of a drainage district with water impoundment structures constructed with financing from the United States under Public Law 534 or Public Law 566, 83rd Congress of the United States, or both, may be transferred to the county soil and water conservation district if it becomes apparent that such drainage district should be dissolved, but future oversight, maintenance and operation are required for the existing structures.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2001, ch. 474, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 51-33-127.
Procedures for transfer of drainage district attributes to county soil and water conservation district; dissolution of drainage district; continuation of maintenance and operation of existing structures.

A drainage district may be dissolved and its powers, duties and responsibilities transferred to the county soil and water conservation district by:

The commissioners of the drainage district determining and spreading on the district’s minutes that it is in the best interest of the residents and landowners of the drainage district that the district be dissolved and its powers, duties and responsibilities be transferred to the county soil and water conservation district. In any drainage district in which there are not any active drainage district commissioners, or in which the drainage district has ceased to function, the county soil and water conservation district commissioners and the county board of supervisors may begin the dissolution and transfer. If the dissolution of the drainage district and transfer of powers occurs without a resolution from the drainage district commissioners, the chancery court, in its proceedings under subsection (1)(e), must determine and state that there is not an active drainage district or there are not any drainage district commissioners, or both.

The commissioners of the county soil and water conservation district determining, and spreading on the district’s minutes, that it is in the best interest of the residents and landowners of the drainage district that the drainage district be dissolved and its powers, duties and responsibilities be transferred to the county soil and water conservation district. Then, the county soil and water conservation district must decide if it is willing to accept those powers, duties and responsibilities.

The county board of supervisors agreeing, and spreading on the county’s minutes, that the drainage district should be dissolved and its powers, duties and responsibilities be transferred to the county soil and water conservation district. If the county supervisors agree to transfer the drainage district to the county soil and water conservation district, they must register their support by one (1) of the following methods of funding the operation and maintenance of the existing water impoundment structures:

Continuation of existing ad valorem tax assessments on benefited or affected acres with the ad valorem taxes being used by the county soil and water conservation district solely for the operation and maintenance of existing water impoundment structures transferred from the drainage district.

If there has not been an ad valorem tax assessment or if the assessment has expired, the establishment of ad valorem tax assessments on benefited or affected acres and collection of the ad valorem taxes solely for the operation and maintenance of the existing water impoundment structures transferred from the drainage district. The ad valorem assessment and collection of taxes shall comply with the procedures authorized in Sections 51-29-45 through 51-29-57.

If there has not been an ad valorem tax assessment or if it has expired, the county board of supervisors may agree to provide funds, through county appropriation, to the county soil and water conservation district for the operation and maintenance of the transferred water impoundment structures.

Upon completion of the requirements of subsection (1)(a) through (c), the commissioners of the drainage district or the commissioners of the county soil and water conservation district, or both, shall petition the chancery court of the county in which the drainage district was originally established for the dissolution of the drainage district and the transference of its powers, duties and responsibilities to the soil and water conservation district. The petition must be accompanied by copies of the minutes reflecting the actions of the drainage district, the soil and water conservation district and the county board of supervisors. After the petition is filed, it shall be the duty of the clerk of the court to give notice of the filing by publishing the notice in a newspaper published in the county for three (3) consecutive weeks or by publishing the notice in a newspaper published in the counties in which the lands of the drainage district lie. The notice shall be addressed to all persons interested in the drainage district and shall require them to appear before the chancery court at a place within the district of the chancery court on a day certain but not earlier than twenty (20) days or more than sixty (60) days after the date of the first publication of the notice, and show cause, if any, of why the petition should not be granted.

On the date set by the court, the chancellor shall review the petition, minutes of the respective districts and board of supervisors, and any other evidence or testimony the court finds necessary, and if the court determines:

Subsection (1)(a) through (c) of this section has been complied with; and

It is in the best interest of the landowners and residents of the drainage district to dissolve the drainage district and transfer the drainage district’s powers, duties and responsibilities to the county soil and water conservation district, the court shall enter its order:

1. Dissolving the drainage district.

2. Transferring all the powers, duties and responsibilities of the drainage district to the county soil and water conservation district.

3. Provide funding for the future operation and maintenance of the existing water impoundment structures by either:

a. Transferring existing authority to assess benefited or affected acres for ad valorem taxation;

b. Authorizing the county soil and water conservation district to assess ad valorem taxes on benefited or affected acres in the manner authorized for drainage districts in Sections 51-29-45 through 51-29-57; or

c. Recognizing that the county board of supervisors will determine and provide funding amounts for the operation and maintenance of the water impoundment structures by the county soil and water conservation district.

4. Transferring all assets of the drainage district, real or personal, or both, and any other assets, wherever they are situated, to the county soil and water conservation district.

If a drainage district’s boundaries cross county lines:

Subsection (1)(b) and (c) must be completed by the county soil and water conservation district and the county board of supervisors for each county in which the drainage district has existing water impoundment structures constructed with financing from the United States under Public Law 534 or Public Law 566, 83rd Congress of the United States; and

The chancery court’s division of powers, duties and responsibilities, together with the funding responsibilities for operation and maintenance of existing structures, shall be in accordance with the agreement of all county soil and water conservation districts and county board of supervisors within whose boundaries the drainage district’s structures lie.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2001, ch. 474, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2001.